src/yrk-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +ProN +Num

! Vербал MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf +PrfIpf +HstPrf +PluPrf +HstPluPrf
+Ind +Imp +Cond +Opt
! Subject indices
+Sx1Sg +Sx2Sg +Sx3Sg 
+Sx1Du +Sx2Du +Sx3Du 
+Sx1Pl +Sx2Pl +Sx3Pl 
! Object indices
+Ox1Sg +Ox2Sg +Ox3Sg 
+Ox1Du +Ox2Du +Ox3Du 
+Ox1Pl +Ox2Pl +Ox3Pl 
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
+Inf
+Pos +Neg

! Nоминал MSP
+Sg +Pl
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Abl +Dat +Loc +Pros +Tra +Abe +Adc +Ins +Apr +Ine +Ill +Ela +Egr
+Prl
+Ord
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
+Qst

+Appr
+Advc
+Ter
+Pro
+Car 

+Pers
+Dem

+PstI
+PstII

%>
! Protoletters for xfst
А1 ! This is the schwa or reduced vowel occurring after x in case endings
 ! -хА1на -хА1д
Д1 С1 Н1 Ӈ1 ! These are proto-glottals
Г1 В1 Е1 Е2 Ы1 ! These are for developing underlying morphology rules

! Kеы леъицон

LEXICON Root
AdjRoot ;
AdvRoot ;
NounRoot ;
NumRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
CONJUNCTION ;
SUBJUNCTION ;
INTERJECTION ;
NUMERAL ;
PronRoot ;
POSTPOSITION ;
PUNCTUATION ;



! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CONJUNCTION 
но CT ;
нош CT ;

LEXICON CT
+CS: # ;
 
LEXICON SUBJUNCTION  
# ;

LEXICON INTERJECTION 
# ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
#;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
+Num: K;
+Num:%> CASESUF ;
+Num:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
+Ord:этӥ K;



LEXICON K
+Qst:а #;
#; 


LEXICON PUNCTUATION
#; 
LEXICON POSTPOSITION
#; 

LEXICON CADJ
+A: #; 
LEXICON DADJ
+A: #; 
LEXICON VADJ
+A: #;
 
LEXICON AdvEnd
#; 
LEXICON CASESUF
#; 
LEXICON PRON
#; 
LEXICON DEM
#; 
LEXICON PERS
#; 
